dev/ortho/cyr-ipa.twol
Alphabet 

 !ء
 !ئ ا ە ب پ ت ج چ خ د ر ز ژ س ش غ ف ق ك گ ڭ ل م ن ھ و ۇ ۆ ۋ ې ى ي  ٸ ٶ ٷ ٵ 
 
 !% ء

 ! ء ا ە ه ې ب ت پ ج چ خ ح د ر ز ژ س ش ع ف ق ك گ ڭ ل م ن ھ و ۇ ۋ ى ي ۆ

 А:ɑ
 Б:b Б:β
 В:v
 Г:ɡ Г:ɣ Г:ʁ Г:ɢ
 Д:d
 Е:e
 Ж:ʤ Ж:ʒ
 З:z
 И:i
 Й:j
 К:k К:q
 Л:l Л:ɫ
 М:m
 Н:n
 Ң:ŋ Ң:ɴ
 О:o
 Ө:ø
 П:p
 Р:ɾ
 С:s
 Т:t
 У:u
 Ү:y
 Ф:f
 Х:χ  ! خ
 Ч:ʧ
 Ш:ʃ
 Щ:ɕ
 Ь:ʲ
 Ы:ɯ
 Ъ:0
 Э:e

 а:ɑ
 б:b б:β
 в:v
 г:ɡ г:ɣ г:ʁ г:ɢ
 д:d
 е:e
 ж:ʤ ж:ʒ
 з:z
 и:i
 й:j
 к:k к:q
 л:l л:ɫ
 м:m
 н:n
 ң:ŋ ң:ɴ
 о:o
 ө:ø
 п:p
 р:ɾ
 с:s
 т:t
 у:u
 ү:y
 ф:f
 х:χ  ! خ
 ч:ʧ
 ш:ʃ
 щ:ɕ
 ь:ʲ
 ы:ɯ
 ъ:0
 э:e

 %{й%}:0
 %{й%}:j

 %{ˈ%}:0
 %{ˈ%}:ˈ
 
 ;


Sets 

Vow = и ү е э ө а о у ы ;

!letter = ء ئ ا ە ب پ ت ج چ خ د ر ز ژ س ش غ ف ق ك گ ڭ ل م ن ھ و ۇ ۅ ۉ ۋ ى ي ;

backVow = а о ы у
          А О Ы У ;

Cons = б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ 
       Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ ;

frontConsCyr = к г
               К Г ;

Nasal = Н М Ң
        н м ң ;

!frontLetter = ك گ ە ۅ ۉ ;

frontSound = k ɡ ɣ ŋ e i ø y ;

!backLetter = ق ع ا و ۇ ;

backSound = q ʁ ɢ ɴ ɑ ɯ o u ;

Rules 

"%{й%}:j after vowels except е"
%{й%}:j <=> [ Vow: - [ э: | е: ] ]/%{ˈ%}: _ ;

"к г ң in the context of back vowels"
Cx:Cy <=> backVow:/%{ˈ%}: _ ;
          _ backVow:/%{ˈ%}: ;
      except
          .#. а:/%{ˈ%}: _ (%{й%}:) е:/%{ˈ%}: ;  ! аке:ɑˈke
          .#. б:/%{ˈ%}: (%{й%}:) е:/%{ˈ%}: _ а:/%{ˈ%}: ;  ! Бегайым:beɣɑjɯm
          Nasal:/%{ˈ%}: _ ;
!          .#. _ (Cons:*/%{ˈ%}:*) Vow: ; 
          ! keep in mind if modifying this rule:
          ! - байке:bɑjke
          ! - багелек:bɑɣelek
      where Cx in ( к г ң )
            Cy in ( q ʁ ɴ )
      matched ;

"г is a stop after nasals"
г:Cy <=> Vx: Cons:*/%{ˈ%}: Nasal:/%{ˈ%}: _ ;
!         .#. _ (Cons:*/%{ˈ%}:*) Vx: ;         ! грил
     where Vx in ( и ү е э ө а о у ы )
           Cy in ( ɡ ɡ ɡ ɡ ɡ ɢ ɢ ɢ ɢ )
     matched ;

"к and г in onset clusters (loanwords)"
Cx:Cy <=> .#. (%{ˈ%}:) _ Cons:/%{ˈ%}: ;
      where Cx in ( к г )
            Cy in ( k ɡ )
      matched ;

"stress on last syllable"
%{ˈ%}:ˈ <=>  _ Cons:/%{ˈ%}: Vow:/%{ˈ%}: (Vow:/%{ˈ%}:) Cons:*/%{ˈ%}: .#. ;
            .#. _ Cons:*/%{ˈ%}: Vow:/%{ˈ%}: (Vow:/%{ˈ%}:) Cons:/%{ˈ%}:* .#. ;
        except
            .#. Cons:/%{ˈ%}: Cons:*/%{ˈ%}: _ ;

"б as β"
б:β <=> Vow:/%{ˈ%}: _ Vow:/%{ˈ%}: ;

"dark ɫ"
л:ɫ <=> backVow:/%{ˈ%}: _ ;
        _ backVow:/%{ˈ%}: ;
    except
        :j (%{ˈ%}:) _ ;
        _ ь: ;

"second of long vowel as ː"
Vx:ː <=> Vy:/%{ˈ%}: _ ;
     where Vy in ( ү э ө а о у )
           Vx in ( ү э ө а о у )
     matched ;

"ж as ʒ only after д"
ж:ʒ <=> д:/%{ˈ%}: _ ;

! remaining issues:
!  - [x] грузин *ɢɾuˈzin / гладиатор *ɢɫɑdiɑtor / группа *ɢɾuppɑ
!  - [x] Чжин *ʧˈʤin / план *pˈɫɑn
!  - [x] джентльмен *dʤentlʲmen
!  - теңир *teɴiɾ
!  - stress before {E}, {B}{I}
!  - stress in Russian words
!  - бекем *—
!  - [x] поэзиянын *poːzijɑˈnɯn
!  - [x] поезд *poezd
